Hawaii statutes.
§264-84 Control of junkyards.
No person shall establish, operate, or maintain a junkyard, any portion of
which is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any
federal-aid or state highways within the State, except the following:

(1) Those which are screened by natural objects,
plantings, fences, or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the
main traveled way of a federal-aid or state highway.

(2) Those which are not visible from the main
traveled way of a federal-aid or state highway. [L 1966, c 46, pt of §2; HRS
§264-84]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next